Hawaii statutes.
[§269-16.91] Universal service subsidies.
(a) For any alternative telecommunications provider authorized to provide
basic local exchange service to any area of the State pursuant to section
269-16.9(h), the commission may consider the following:

(1) Transferring the subsidy, if any, of the local
exchange provider's basic residential telephone service to the alternative
provider; and

(2) Transferring from the local exchange carrier to
the alternative provider the amounts, if any, generated by the local exchange
provider's services other than basic residential telephone service and which
are used to subsidize basic residential service in the area.

(b) To receive the subsidy amounts from the
local exchange service provider, the alternative telecommunications provider
shall be required, to the extent possible, to obtain basic residential service
subsidies from both the local exchange service provider and national universal
service providers. [L 1994, c 80, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next